Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6114XS (4) 91 da/js S.F. 2460 Section 1. Section 256.226, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. (1) Secure Subject to subparagraph (2), secure an 3 offer of employment or establish and maintain a practice in a 4 veterinary shortage situation or rural service commitment area 5 and engage in the full-time practice of veterinary medicine 6 for a period of four consecutive years after entering into the 7 agreement in the veterinary shortage area or rural service 8 commitment area , unless the loan repayment recipient receives . 9 (2) (a) The loan repayment recipient may notify the 10 commission that the loan repayment recipient will complete the 11 years of full-time practice required under the agreement by 12 securing new employment, or establishing and maintaining a new 13 practice, in the same veterinary shortage area or rural service 14 commitment area, according to rules adopted by the commission. 15 (b) The commission may grant the loan repayment recipient a 16 waiver from the commission to complete the years of full-time 17 practice required under the agreement in another veterinary 18 shortage area or rural service commitment area pursuant to 19 subsection 7 . 20 Sec. 2. Section 422.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 46. a. Subtract, to the extent included, 23 loan repayments received under a program agreement entered into 24 between a taxpayer who is a loan repayment recipient and the 25 college student aid commission pursuant to section 256.226, if 26 the taxpayer fulfills the obligation to engage in the practice 27 of veterinary medicine according to terms of that section 28 including the program agreement. 29 b. The subtraction in paragraph âaâ shall not exceed the 30 following limits: 31 (1) For any tax year, fifteen thousand dollars. 32 (2) For the aggregate of all tax years, sixty thousand 33 dollars. 34 (3) In any case, the amount of the outstanding eligible 35 -1- LSB 6114XS (4) 91 da/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2460 loan. 1